Washington statutes.
RCW 32.20.215

Obligations issued or guaranteed by Inter-American Development Bank.

A mutual savings bank may invest not to exceed five percent of its funds in obligations issued or guaranteed by the Inter-American Development Bank.

[ 1963 c 176 s 14.]